California statutes. Penal Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 232.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 3. OF OFFENSES AGAINST THE SOVEREIGNTY OF THE STATE [37. - 38.]

37.

(a) Treason against this state consists only in levying war against it, adhering to its enemies, or giving them aid and comfort, and can be committed only by persons owing allegiance to the state. The punishment of treason shall be death or life imprisonment without possibility of parole. The penalty shall be determined pursuant to Sections 190.3 and 190.4.

(b) Upon a trial for treason, the defendant cannot be convicted unless upon the testimony of two witnesses to the same overt act, or upon confession in open court; nor, except as provided in Sections 190.3 and 190.4, can evidence be admitted of an overt act not expressly charged in the indictment or information; nor can the defendant be convicted unless one or more overt acts be expressly alleged therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 897, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

38.

Misprision of treason is the knowledge and concealment of treason, without otherwise assenting to or participating in the crime. It is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 233.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 5. OF CRIMES BY AND AGAINST THE EXECUTIVE POWER OF THE STATE [67. - 77.]

67.

Every person who gives or offers any bribe to any executive officer in this state, with intent to influence him in respect to any act, decision, vote, opinion, or other proceeding as such officer, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three or four years, and is disqualified from holding any office in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------

67.5.

(a) Every person who gives or offers as a bribe to any ministerial officer, employee, or appointee of the State of California, county or city therein, or political subdivision thereof, any thing the theft of which would be petty theft is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) If the theft of the thing given or offered would be grand theft the offense is a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 234.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

68.

(a) Every executive or ministerial officer, employee, or appointee of the State of California, a county or city therein, or a political subdivision thereof, who asks, receives, or agrees to receive, any bribe, upon any agreement or understanding that his or her vote, opinion, or action upon any matter then pending, or that may be brought before him or her in his or her official capacity, shall be influenced thereby, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years and, in cases in which no bribe has been actually received, by a restitution fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or, in cases in which a bribe was actually received, by a restitution fine of at least the actual amount of the bribe received or two thousand dollars ($2,000), whichever is greater, or any larger amount of not more than double the amount of any bribe received or ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever is greater, and, in addition thereto, forfeits his or her office, employment, or appointment, and is forever disqualified from holding any office, employment, or appointment, in this state.

(b) In imposing a restitution fine pursuant to this section, the court shall consider the defendant’s ability to pay the fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

69.

(a) Every person who attempts, by means of any threat or violence, to deter or prevent an executive officer from performing any duty imposed upon the officer by law, or who knowingly resists, by the use of force or violence, the
 officer, in the performance of his
 or her duty, is punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(b) The fact that a person takes a photograph or makes an audio or video recording of an executive officer, while the officer is in a public place or the person taking the photograph or making the recording is in a place he or she has the right to be, does not constitute, in and of itself, a violation of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 177, Sec. 1.   (SB 411)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

70.

(a) Every executive or ministerial officer, employee, or appointee of the State of California, or any county or city therein, or any political subdivision thereof, who knowingly asks, receives, or agrees to receive any emolument, gratuity, or reward, or any promise thereof excepting such as may be authorized by law for doing an official act, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) This section does not prohibit deputy registrars of voters from receiving compensation when authorized by local ordinance from any candidate, political committee, or statewide political organization for securing the registration of voters.

(c) (1) Nothing in this section precludes a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, from engaging in, or being employed in, casual or part-time employment as a private security guard or patrolman for a public entity while off duty from his or her principal employment and outside his or her regular employment as a peace officer of a state or local agency, and exercising the powers of a peace officer concurrently with that employment, provided that the peace officer is in a police uniform and is subject to reasonable rules and regulations of the agency for which he or she is a peace officer. Notwithstanding the above provisions, any and all civil and criminal liability arising out of the secondary employment of any peace officer pursuant to this subdivision shall be borne by the officer’s secondary employer.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature by this subdivision to abrogate the holdings in People v. Corey, 21 Cal.3d 738, and Cervantez v. J.C. Penney Co., 24 Cal.3d 579, to reinstate prior judicial interpretations of this section as they relate to criminal sanctions for battery on peace officers who are employed, on a part-time or casual basis, by a public entity, while wearing a police uniform as private security guards or patrolmen, and to allow the exercise of peace officer powers concurrently with that employment.

(d) (1) Nothing in this section precludes a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, from engaging in, or being employed in, casual or part-time employment as a private security guard or patrolman by a private employer while off duty from his or her principal employment and outside his or her regular employment as a peace officer, and exercising the powers of a peace officer concurrently with that employment, provided that all of the following are true:

(A) The peace officer is in his or her police uniform.

(B) The casual or part-time employment as a private security guard or patrolman is approved by the county board of supervisors with jurisdiction over the principal employer or by the board’s designee or by the city council with jurisdiction over the principal employer or by the council’s designee.

(C) The wearing of uniforms and equipment is approved by the principal employer.

(D) The peace officer is subject to reasonable rules and regulations of the agency for which he or she is a peace officer.

(2) Notwithstanding the above provisions, a peace officer while off duty from his or her principal employment and outside his or her regular employment as a peace officer of a state or local agency shall not exercise the powers of a police officer if employed by a private employer as a security guard during a strike, lockout, picketing, or other physical demonstration of a labor dispute at the site of the strike, lockout, picketing, or other physical demonstration of a labor dispute. The issue of whether or not casual or part-time employment as a private security guard or patrolman pursuant to this subdivision is to be approved shall not be a subject for collective bargaining. Any and all civil and criminal liability arising out of the secondary employment of any peace officer pursuant to this subdivision shall be borne by the officer’s principal employer. The principal employer shall require the secondary employer to enter into an indemnity agreement as a condition of approving casual or part-time employment pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature by this subdivision to abrogate the holdings in People v. Corey, 21 Cal. 3d 738, and Cervantez v. J. C. Penney Co., 24 Cal. 3d 579, to reinstate prior judicial interpretations of this section as they relate to criminal sanctions for battery on peace officers who are employed, on a part-time or casual basis, while wearing a police uniform approved by the principal employer, as private security guards or patrolmen, and to allow the exercise of peace officer powers concurrently with that employment.

(e) (1) Nothing in this section precludes a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, from engaging in, or being employed in, other employment while off duty from his or her principal employment and outside his or her regular employment as a peace officer of a state or local agency.

(2) Subject to subdivisions (c) and (d), and except as provided by written regulations or policies adopted by the employing state or local agency, or pursuant to an agreement between the employing state or local agency and a recognized employee organization representing the peace officer, no peace officer shall be prohibited from engaging in, or being employed in, other employment while off duty from his or her principal employment and outside his or her regular employment as a peace officer of a state or local agency.

(3) If an employer withholds consent to allow a peace officer to engage in or be employed in other employment while off duty, the employer shall, at the time of denial, provide the reasons for denial in writing to the peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 104, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

70.5.

Every commissioner of civil marriages or every deputy commissioner of civil marriages who accepts any money or other thing of value for performing any marriage pursuant to Section 401 of the Family Code, including any money or thing of value voluntarily tendered by the persons about to be married or who have been married by the commissioner of civil marriages or deputy commissioner of civil marriages, other than a fee expressly imposed by law for performance of a marriage, whether the acceptance occurs before or after performance of the marriage and whether or not performance of the marriage is conditioned on the giving of such money or the thing of value by the persons being married, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

It is not a necessary element of the offense described by this section that the acceptance of the money or other thing of value be committed with intent to commit extortion or with other criminal intent.

This section does not apply to the request or acceptance by any retired commissioner of civil marriages of a fee for the performance of a marriage.

This section is inapplicable to the acceptance of a fee for the performance of a marriage on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

71.

(a) Every person who, with intent to cause, attempts to cause, or causes, any officer or employee of any public or private educational institution or any public officer or employee to do, or refrain from doing, any act in the performance of his duties, by means of a threat, directly communicated to such person, to inflict an unlawful injury upon any person or property, and it reasonably appears to the recipient of the threat that such threat could be carried out, is guilty of a public offense punishable as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction, such person is punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170,
 or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) If the person has been previously convicted of a violation of this section, such previous conviction shall be charged in the accusatory pleading, and if that previous conviction is found to be true by the jury, upon a jury trial, or by the court, upon a court trial, or is admitted by the defendant, he or she is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(b) As used in this section, “directly communicated” includes, but is not limited to, a communication to the recipient of the threat by telephone, telegraph, or letter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 236.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

72.

Every person who, with intent to defraud, presents for allowance or for payment to any state board or officer, or to any county, city, or district board or officer, authorized to allow or pay the same if genuine, any false or fraudulent claim, bill, account, voucher, or writing, is punishable either by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than one year, by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, by a fine of not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both such imprisonment and fine.

As used in this section “officer” includes a “carrier,” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section
 14124.70 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, authorized to act as an agent for a state board or officer or a county, city, or district board or officer, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 237.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

72.5.

(a) Every person who, knowing a claim seeks public funds for reimbursement of costs incurred in attending a political function organized to support or oppose any political party or political candidate, presents such a claim for allowance or for payment to any state board or officer, or to any county, city, or district board or officer authorized to allow or pay such claims, is punishable either by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than one year, by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, by a fine of not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both such imprisonment and fine.

(b) Every person who, knowing a claim seeks public funds for reimbursement of costs incurred to gain admittance to a political function expressly organized to support or oppose any ballot measure, presents such a claim for allowance or for payment to any state board or officer, or to any county, city, or district board or officer authorized to allow or pay those claims is punishable either by imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not more than one year, by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, by a fine of not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 238.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

73.

Every person who gives or offers any gratuity or reward, in consideration that he or any other person shall be appointed to any public office, or shall be permitted to exercise or discharge the duties thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

74.

Every public officer who, for any gratuity or reward, appoints another person to a public office, or permits another person to exercise or discharge any of the duties of his office, is punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and, in addition thereto, forfeits his office and is forever disqualified from holding any office in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 234.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

76.

(a) Every person who knowingly and willingly threatens the life of, or threatens serious bodily harm to, any elected public official, county public defender, county clerk, exempt appointee of the Governor, judge, or Deputy Commissioner of the Board of Prison Terms, or the staff, immediate family, or immediate family of the staff of any elected public official, county public defender, county clerk, exempt appointee of the Governor, judge, or Deputy Commissioner of the Board of Prison Terms, with the specific intent that the statement is to be taken as a threat, and the apparent ability to carry out that threat by any means, is guilty of a public offense, punishable as follows:

(1) Upon a
 first conviction, the offense is punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) If the person has been convicted previously of violating this section, the previous conviction shall be charged in the accusatory pleading, and if the previous conviction is found to be true by the jury upon a jury trial, or by the court upon a court trial, or is admitted by the defendant, the offense is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(b) Any law enforcement agency that has knowledge of a violation of this section involving a constitutional officer of the state, a Member of the Legislature, or a member of the judiciary shall immediately report that information to the Department of the
 California Highway Patrol.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Apparent ability to carry out that threat” includes the ability to fulfill the threat at some future date when the person making the threat is an incarcerated prisoner with a stated release date.

(2) “Serious bodily harm” includes serious physical injury or serious traumatic condition.

(3) “Immediate family” means a spouse, parent, or child, or anyone who has regularly resided in the household for the past six months.

(4) “Staff of a judge” means court officers and employees, including commissioners, referees, and retired judges sitting on assignment.

(5) “Threat” means a verbal or written threat or a threat implied by a pattern of conduct or a combination of verbal or written statements and conduct made with the intent and the apparent ability to carry out the threat so as to cause the person who is the target of the threat to reasonably fear for his or her safety or the safety of his or her immediate family.

(d) As for threats against staff or immediate family of staff, the threat must relate directly to the official duties of the staff of the elected public official, county public defender, county clerk, exempt appointee of the Governor, judge, or Deputy Commissioner of the Board of Prison Terms in order to constitute a public offense under this section.

(e) A threat must relate directly to the official duties of a Deputy Commissioner of the Board of Prison Terms
 in order to constitute a public offense under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 239.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

76.5.

(a) No person shall knowingly post the home address or telephone number of any elected or appointed official, or of the official’s residing spouse or child, on the internet knowing that person is an elected or appointed official and intending to cause imminent great bodily harm that is likely to occur or threatening to cause imminent great bodily harm to that individual.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(c) A violation of this section that leads to the bodily injury of the official, or the official’s residing spouse or child, is a misdemeanor or a felony.

(d) “Elected or appointed official” has the same
 meaning as that term is defined in Section 7920.500 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 200, Sec. 25.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

77.

The various provisions of this title, except Section 76, apply to administrative and ministerial officers, in the same manner as if they were mentioned therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1405, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 6. OF CRIMES AGAINST THE LEGISLATIVE POWER [85. - 88.]

85.

Every person who gives or offers to give a bribe to any Member of the Legislature, any member of the legislative body of a city, county, city and county, school district, or other special district, or to another person for the member, or attempts by menace, deceit, suppression of truth, or any corrupt means, to influence a member in giving or withholding his or her vote, or in not attending the house or any committee of which he or she is a member, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three or four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 435, Sec. 1.   Effective September 24, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

86.

Every Member of either house of the Legislature, or any member of the legislative body of a city, county, city and county, school district, or other special district, who asks, receives, or agrees to receive, any bribe, upon any understanding that his or her official vote, opinion, judgment, or action shall be influenced thereby, or shall give, in any particular manner, or upon any particular side of any question or matter upon which he or she may be required to act in his or her official capacity, or gives, or offers or promises to give, any official vote in consideration that another Member of the Legislature, or another member of the legislative body of a city, county, city and county, school district, or other special district
 shall give this vote either upon the same or another question, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years and, in cases in which no bribe has been actually received, by a restitution fine of not less than four thousand dollars ($4,000) or not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or, in cases in which a bribe was actually received, by a restitution fine of at least the actual amount of the bribe received or four thousand dollars ($4,000), whichever is greater, or any larger amount of not more than double the amount of any bribe received or twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), whichever is greater.

In imposing a fine under this section, the court shall consider the defendant’s ability to pay the fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 881, Sec. 2.   (AB 1666)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

88.

Every Member of the Legislature, and every member of a legislative body of a city, county, city and county, school district, or other special district convicted of any crime defined in this title, in addition to the punishment prescribed, forfeits his or her office and is forever disqualified from holding any office in this state or a political subdivision thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 435, Sec. 3.   Effective September 24, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 7. OF CRIMES AGAINST PUBLIC JUSTICE [92. - 186.36.]



  CHAPTER 1. Bribery and Corruption [92. - 100.]

92.

Every person who gives or offers to give a bribe to any judicial officer, juror, referee, arbitrator, or umpire, or to any person who may be authorized by law to hear or determine any question or controversy, with intent to influence his vote, opinion, or decision upon any matter or question which is or may be brought before him for decision, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three or four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------

93.

(a) Every judicial officer, juror, referee, arbitrator, or umpire, and every person authorized by law to hear or determine any question or controversy, who asks, receives, or agrees to receive, any bribe, upon any agreement or understanding that his or her vote, opinion, or decision upon any matters or question which is or may be brought before him or her for decision, shall be influenced thereby, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years and, in cases where no bribe has been actually received, by a
 restitution fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or, in cases where a bribe was actually received, by a restitution fine of at least the actual amount of the bribe received or two thousand dollars ($2,000), whichever is greater, or any larger amount of not more than double the amount of any bribe received or ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever is greater.

(b) In imposing a restitution fine under this section, the court shall consider the defendant’s ability to pay the fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 282, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

94.

Every judicial officer who asks or receives any emolument, gratuity, or reward, or any promise thereof, except such as may be authorized by law, for doing any official act, is guilty of a misdemeanor. The lawful compensation of a temporary judge shall be prescribed by Judicial Council rule. Every judicial officer who shall ask or receive the whole or any part of the fees allowed by law to any stenographer or reporter appointed by him or her, or any other person, to record the proceedings of any court or investigation held by him or her, shall be guilty of a
 misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall forfeit his or her office. Any stenographer or reporter, appointed by any judicial officer in this state, who shall pay, or offer to pay, the whole or any part of the fees allowed him or her by law, for his or her appointment or retention in office, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be forever disqualified from holding any similar office in the courts of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 909, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

94.5.

Every judge, justice, commissioner, or assistant commissioner of a court of this state who accepts any money or other thing of value for performing any marriage, including any money or thing of value voluntarily tendered by the persons about to be married or who have been married by such judge, justice, commissioner, or assistant commissioner, whether the acceptance occurs before or after performance of the marriage and whether or not performance of the marriage is conditioned on the giving of such money or the thing of value by the persons being married, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

It is not a necessary element
 of the offense described by this section that the acceptance of the money or other thing of value be committed with intent to commit extortion or with other criminal intent.

This section does not apply to the request for or acceptance of a fee expressly imposed by law for performance of a marriage or to the request or acceptance by any retired judge, retired justice, or retired commissioner of a fee for the performance of a marriage. For the purposes of this section, a retired judge or retired justice sitting on assignment in court shall not be deemed to be a retired judge or retired justice.

This section does not apply to an acceptance of a fee for performing a marriage on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

95.

Every person who corruptly attempts to influence a juror, or any person summoned or drawn as a juror, or chosen as an arbitrator or umpire, or appointed a referee, in respect to his or her verdict in, or decision of, any cause or proceeding, pending, or about to be brought before him or her, is punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision
 (h) of Section 1170, if it is by means of any of the following:

(a) Any oral or written communication with him or her except in the regular course of proceedings.

(b) Any book, paper, or instrument exhibited, otherwise than in the regular course of proceedings.

(c) Any threat, intimidation, persuasion, or entreaty.

(d) Any promise, or assurance of any pecuniary or other advantage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 240.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

95.1.

Every person who threatens a juror with respect to a criminal proceeding in which a verdict has been rendered and who has the intent and apparent ability to carry out the threat so as to cause the target of the threat to reasonably fear for his or her safety or the safety of his or her immediate family, is guilty of a public offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more
 than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 241.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

95.2.

Any person who, with knowledge of the relationship of the parties and without court authorization and juror consent, intentionally provides a defendant or former defendant to any criminal proceeding information from records sealed by the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 237 of the Code of Civil Procedure, knowing that the records have been sealed, in order to locate or communicate with a juror to that proceeding and that information is used to violate Section 95 or 95.1, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Except as otherwise provided by any other law or
 court order limiting communication with a juror after a verdict has been reached, compliance with Section 206 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall constitute court authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 971, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

95.3.

Any person licensed pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code who, with knowledge of the relationship of the parties and without court authorization and juror consent, knowingly provides a defendant or former defendant to any criminal proceeding information in order to locate or communicate with a juror to that proceeding is guilty of a misdemeanor. Conviction under this section shall be a basis for revocation or suspension of any license issued pursuant to Section 7561.1 of the Business and
 Professions Code. Except as otherwise provided by any law or court order limiting communication with a juror after a verdict has been reached, compliance with Section 206 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall constitute court authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 971, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

96.

Every juror, or person drawn or summoned as a juror, or chosen arbitrator or umpire, or appointed referee, who either:One—Makes any promise or agreement to give a verdict or decision for or against any party; or,Two—Willfully and
 corruptly permits any communication to be made to him, or receives any book, paper, instrument, or information relating to any cause or matter pending before him, except according to the regular course of proceedings,is punishable by fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 242.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

96.5.

(a) Every judicial officer, court commissioner, or referee who commits any act that he or she knows perverts or obstructs justice, is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year.

(b) Nothing in this section prohibits prosecution under paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 182 of the Penal Code or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 853, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

98.

Every officer convicted of any crime defined in this Chapter, in addition to the punishment prescribed, forfeits his office and is forever disqualified from holding any office in this State.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

99.

The Superintendent of State Printing shall not, during his continuance in office, have any interest, either directly or indirectly, in any contract in any way connected with his office as Superintendent of State Printing; nor shall he, during said period, be interested, either directly or indirectly, in any state printing, binding, engraving, lithographing, or other state work of any kind connected
 with his said office; nor shall he, directly or indirectly, be interested in any contract for furnishing paper, or other printing stock or material, to or for use in his said office; and any violations of these provisions shall subject him, on conviction before a court of competent jurisdiction, to imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 and to a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 243.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

100.

If the Superintendent of State Printing corruptly colludes with any person or persons furnishing paper or materials, or bidding therefor, or with any other person or persons, or has any secret understanding with him or them, by himself or through others, to defraud the state, or by which the state is defrauded or made to sustain a loss, contrary to the true intent and meaning of this chapter, he, upon conviction thereof, forfeits his office, and is subject to imprisonment in the state prison, and to a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both such fine and
 imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 238.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Rescues [102. - 102.]

102.

Every person who willfully injures or destroys, or takes or attempts to take, or assists any person in taking or attempting to take, from the custody of any officer or person, any personal property which such officer or person has in charge under any process of law, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Escapes and Aiding Therein [107. - 110.]

107.

Every prisoner charged with or convicted of a felony who is an inmate of any public training school or reformatory or county hospital who escapes or attempts to escape from such public training school or reformatory or county hospital is guilty of a felony and is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by
 both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 244.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

109.

Any person who willfully assists any inmate of any public training school or reformatory to escape, or in an attempt to escape from that public training school or reformatory is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, and fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 245.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

110.

Every person who carries or sends into a public training school, or reformatory, anything useful to aid a prisoner or inmate in making his escape, with intent thereby to facilitate the escape of any prisoner or inmate confined therein, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Forging, Stealing, Mutilating, and Falsifying Judicial and Public Records and Documents [112. - 117.]

112.

(a) Any person who manufactures or sells any false government document with the intent to conceal the true citizenship or resident status for immigration purposes of another person is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for one year. Every false government document that is manufactured or sold in violation of this section may be charged and prosecuted as a separate and distinct violation, and consecutive sentences may be imposed for each violation.

(b) A prosecuting attorney shall have discretion to charge a defendant with a violation of this section or any other law that applies.
